Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 55

Information Systems Council

4-3-5501. Establishment — Membership — Appointment — Compensation.

The entire membership of the information systems council as comprised on June 30, 2015, shall be vacated on July 1, 2015, and new members shall be appointed in accordance with subsection (b).

There is hereby created an information systems council, to be composed of the following members:

The commissioner of finance and administration;

The commissioner of general services;

The comptroller of the treasury;

The speaker of the senate, or the speaker's designee;

The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee;

Two (2) members of the senate, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate;

Two (2) members of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

The director of legislative information systems, appointed pursuant to § 3-16-102;

Two (2) private citizens who have demonstrated expertise and experience in managing large and diverse information management systems, both of whom shall be appointed by the governor. The private citizen members shall each serve three-year terms;

One (1) commissioner of the Tennessee public utility commission or designee, to be appointed by the chair of the commission, who shall be a member whenever the council considers statewide telecommunications issues or other matters relating directly to areas over which the commission has responsibility;

The chief justice of the supreme court of Tennessee, or the chief justice's designee;

One (1) state employee who has experience in the field of information systems, to be appointed by the governor; and

The chair of the state employee-run information systems management group.

The persons appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(K) shall be voting members of the council.

The persons appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(L) and (M) shall be nonvoting members of the council.

Legislative members of the council shall be appointed for two-year terms and shall serve only so long as they remain members of the general assembly. Any legislative vacancy on the council shall be filled by appointment by the appropriate speaker, for the purpose of serving out the remainder of the unexpired term.

Any vacancy among the private citizen members of the council shall be filled by the governor to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(F), (G), (H), (I), (J), (L), and (M) shall be eligible for reappointment to the council.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall serve as the chair of the information systems council.

The director of legislative information systems shall serve as vice chair of the council.

The council shall meet quarterly at a time established by the chair of the council. Special meetings of the council for the transaction of business may be called by the chair by giving written notice to all members.

Eight (8) voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum, and all official action of the council shall require a quorum.

Members shall attend at least fifty percent (50%) of the required quarterly meetings.

If any council member fails to attend meetings as required by subdivision (e)(3)(A), the chair of the information systems council shall report that member's name and attendance record to the member's appointing authority and the appointing authority shall remove the member from the council.

Legislative members of the information systems council shall be reimbursed as members of the general assembly are paid for attending legislative meetings as provided in § 3-1-106.

Nonlegislative members of the information systems council shall receive no compensation for their work with the council but may be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations, as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1994, ch. 992, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 66; 2004, ch. 897, § 1; 2010, ch. 1077, § 3; 2015, ch. 385, § 3; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 5, 77.

Compiler's Notes. The information systems council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

4-3-5502. Duties and responsibilities.

The duties and responsibilities of the information systems council include the following:

Developing policy guidelines for the overall management of the state's information systems, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Appropriate hardware and software for the state's data center;

Appropriate security and disaster recovery policies and procedures for the state's information systems environment;

The most appropriate and cost effective use of departmental computer systems, which shall, for the purpose of this policy, include the appropriate use and integration of microcomputers and minicomputers into the state's information management system;

The most appropriate and cost effective telecommunication policies;

Establishment of guidelines for the acquisition of both hardware and software;

Making recommendations to the governor and general assembly regarding amendments to the purchasing laws that would be helpful in establishing and operating information systems; and

Establishment of effective long-range planning for the state's information management system; and

To periodically review the overall effectiveness and efficiency with which the state's information systems network is managed. Such review shall be conducted where appropriate on a department by department basis and shall be for the purpose of identifying weaknesses in the current system as well as opportunities for improvements in each department's information system. Such reports as may be issued pursuant to this review shall be transmitted to the appropriate agency head, the governor and the speakers of the senate and house of representatives. Such a review shall include, but not be limited to:

The adequacy of systems development planning and implementation;

Opportunities for increased efficiency through either a reduction of the long run current operating costs for various programs of state government, or the opportunity to provide increased services through more effective use of management information systems, or both; and

The most appropriate and cost effective hardware and software.

Acts 1994, ch. 992, § 3.

4-3-5503. Staffing — Division of strategic technology solutions.

The division of strategic technology solutions in the department of finance and administration shall serve as staff to the information systems council. In addition, the division of strategic technology solutions shall facilitate the use of information systems, provide technical direction and assistance to departments and agencies for all distributive processing and network related systems, and serve as a computer service bureau.

In accordance with the Federal Information Security Management Act of 2002 (44 U.S.C. § 3541 et seq.), and the criminal justice information services (CJIS) security policy, a criminal history background check performed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation shall be required for all employees and contractors of the division of strategic technology solutions having elevated and privileged access to criminal justice information systems or to information accessed via criminal justice information systems. The department of human resources shall maintain classifications of employees subject to the criminal history background check. Background checks shall include fingerprint checks against state and federal criminal records maintained by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The department of finance and administration shall establish policies concerning the implementation and use of criminal history background checks conducted pursuant to this section.

The state shall pay for costs associated with criminal history background checks conducted pursuant to this section.

Acts 1994, ch. 992, § 4; 2014, ch. 544, § 1; 2016, ch. 846, §§ 3, 4; 2020, ch. 689, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 3541 through 3548 of the United States Code, referred to in (b)(1), were repealed by Act Dec. 18, 2014, P.L. 113-283, § 2(a), 128 Stat. 3073. For similar provisions, see 44 USCS § 3551.

4-3-5504. Policymaking authority — Legislative intent.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the information systems council shall, with the assistance and support of the department of general services and the department of finance and administration, be responsible for establishing the policy under which the state procures telecommunications, computer or computer-related equipment or services. The council, in establishing procurement policy, shall also have the ability to authorize research and development, including the procurement of equipment, for the purpose of improving the state's information system. The role of the council, in establishing such policy, shall not include the administrative or day-to-day operations of the procurement process, including, but not limited to, the selection of vendors to provide equipment or services and the resolution of protests. Such procurements shall be administered by either the department of general services or the department of finance and administration, or both, under present or future laws, rules and regulations governing procurements.

It is the legislative intent that the information systems council, in establishing procurement policy pursuant to this section, select the purchasing method for a procurement that, in the sole discretion of the council, will produce the lowest and best overall costs to the state. In making the determination of which method would produce the lowest and best overall costs, the council shall consider, when appropriate, the costs of the hardware, software development, operations, maintenance, and such other factors as the council determines to be relevant.

Acts 1994, ch. 992, § 5.

4-3-5505. Disposition of surplus computers.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including title 12, chapter 2, part 4, the council has the authority to dispose of surplus state computers and any components thereof, at no cost, to governmental entities and not-for-profit corporations whose chartered activities are related to education.

Acts 1994, ch. 992, § 6.

4-3-5506. Leasing of state communications services.

The information systems council has the authority to establish a program to lease state communications services to public and private agencies, as set forth in policies and procedures prepared by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The council will establish fees consistent for all users of the network based on a cost recovery method approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Disputes about fees established under subsection (a) shall be resolved by the procurement commission.

Acts 1997, ch. 260, § 3; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

4-3-5507. Licensure or sale of state information systems.

The information systems council has the authority to approve license or sale of the state's information systems' interest or copyright to a vendor under policies and procedures prepared by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the comptroller of the treasury. However, any license or sale of the general assembly's information systems' interest or copyright shall be subject to the approval of the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives.

Acts 1997, ch. 260, § 4.

4-3-5508. Information systems council creation and functions.

The information systems council shall perform the functions for which it is responsible under §§47-10-117 —47-10-120 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

Acts 2001, ch. 72, § 24.

4-3-5509. Conduct of meetings with subject matter open to the public and confidential.

If the council holds a meeting covered by the open meeting provisions of title 8, chapter 44, at which subject matter will be discussed that is not confidential and subject matter will be discussed that is confidential pursuant to § 10-7-504(i), the notice of such meeting required pursuant to § 8-44-103 shall specify that part of the meeting will be a public meeting open to the public and part of the meeting will not be open to the public because of discussion of confidential subject matter.

A meeting at which both subject matter open to the public and confidential subject matter will be discussed shall be conducted as follows:

All business relating to subject matter that is public in nature shall be conducted first; and

At the conclusion of the meeting relating to subject matter that is public in nature, the chair shall announce that the public portion of the meeting is adjourned and that the remainder of the meeting will concern matters that are confidential pursuant to § 10-7-504(i). When everyone at the meeting who is not authorized to attend the confidential portion of the meeting has departed, the confidential portion of the meeting shall commence.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the council from acting upon public matters and confidential matters at separate meetings if the council so desires.

Acts 2005, ch. 247, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-3-5510 — 4-3-5524. [Reserved.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Local government” means any county, municipality, city or other political subdivision of this state, including any school districts or school systems created thereby;

“Private agency” means an accredited nonpublic school or a nonprofit institution of higher education eligible for tuition grants;

“Public agency” means a state agency, local government, an institution under the control of the University of Tennessee or the Tennessee board of regents, the judicial department, the legislative department, a special school district or any other local public school system or school district created or authorized by the general assembly, a public library operated by any unit or agency of local or state government, a museum owned or operated by the state or any political subdivision of the state, or an agency or instrumentality of the federal government; and

“State communications” refers to the transmission of voice, data, video, the written word or other visual signals by electronic means but does not include broadcast radio and television facilities.

Acts 1997, ch. 260, § 2.

4-3-111. Chief executive officers of administrative departments.

4-3-121. Commissioners and staff directors as department and division heads.

4-3-508. Contracts and leases entered into prior to July 1, 1991 — Rules, regulations, orders and decisions issued or promulgated by the department.

4-3-714. Legislative intent — Reports.

4-3-727. Local government planning advisory committee.

4-3-730. Records open to public inspection — Exceptions.

4-3-1006. Budget powers.

4-3-1109. Energy efficient state vehicles.

4-3-1111. [Reserved.]

4-3-1414. Notice of entitlement to have state pay health insurance premium.

4-3-1419. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website — Notifications by electronic mail.

4-3-2015. Memorandum of understanding with United States department of homeland security concerning enforcement of federal immigration laws.

4-3-2206. Powers and duties of commissioner.

4-3-5525. Part definitions.